District of Columbia statutes.
29A-221.27

Repealed

Injunction against transferring assets.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1320, ch. 854, § 795
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-221.27.
1981 Ed., § 29-427.
1973 Ed., § 29-727.